District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Greenhouse Gas Emissions Study Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The District Department of the Environment Establishment Act of 2005, effective
February 15, 2006 (D.C. Law 16-51; D.C. Official Code § 8-151.01 et seq.), is amended by
adding a new section 109i to read as follows:
“Sec. 109i. Greenhouse gas emissions study.
“(a) Within 120 days of the effective date of this section, DOEE shall solicit proposals for
the purpose of issuing a grant in the amount of $200,000 to an organization with expertise in
attribution science to conduct a study on the total costs of greenhouse gas emissions in the

District between the years of 1995 and 2024 and the purposes identified in subsection (d) of this
section.
“(b) Within 180 days of the effective date of this section, DOEE shall select the grant
recipient to conduct the study.
“(c) The grant recipient alongside DOEE, shall compile a report detailing the findings of
the study, that shall include:
“(1) A summary of the various cost-driving effects of greenhouse gas emissions
from the relevant time period on the District, including effects on public health, natural
resources, biodiversity, agriculture, economic development, flood preparedness and safety, and
housing, and any other effect that the grantee and DOEE determine to be relevant;
“(2) A categorized calculation of the costs that have been incurred and costs that
are projected to be incurred by the District and its residents for each effect identified under
paragraph (1) of this subsection;
“(3) A categorized calculation of the costs that have been incurred and costs that
are projected to be incurred by the District and its residents to adapt to the effects of covered
greenhouse gas emissions during the covered period; and
“(4) An economic analysis to determine whether there would be a cost passed on
to taxpayers as a result of requiring each fossil fuel company that has a sufficient nexus to the
District and emitted more than 1 billion tons of greenhouse gas emissions globally between 1995
and 2024 to compensate the District for costs related to necessary adaptation to and disaster
recovery from intensifying extreme weather.”.

“(d) The report shall be submitted by the grant recipient to the Mayor and the Council
committee with jurisdiction no later than November 30 of the year following the beginning of the
fiscal year in which the study was funded.
“(e) If requested, the grant recipient shall appear before the Council committee with
jurisdiction over DOEE to report on the total assessed cost of greenhouse gas emissions in the
District based on the findings of the study.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).